Washington statutes.
RCW 35.88.050

Prosecution—Trial—Abatement of nuisance.

If upon the trial of any person for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter he or she is found guilty of creating or maintaining a nuisance or of violating any of the provisions of this chapter, he or she shall forthwith abate the nuisance, and if he or she fails so to do within one day after such conviction, unless further time is granted by the court, a warrant shall be issued by the court wherein the conviction was obtained, directed to the sheriff of the county in which such nuisance exists and the sheriff shall forthwith proceed to abate the said nuisance and the cost thereof shall be taxed against the person so convicted as a part of the costs of such case.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2129; 1965 c 7 s 35.88.050. Prior: 1899 c 70 s 3; RRS s 9475.]